el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία: Γεωργικά μηχανήματα; Κτηνοτροφία
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業: 農業機械; 畜牧業
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug: Landbrugsmaskiner; Husdyrbrug
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業: 農業機械; 畜産
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous: Maatalouskoneet; Karjatalous
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备: 农业机械; 畜牧业
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม: เครื่องจักรกลการเกษตร; การเลี้ยงสัตว์
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture: Machines agricoles; Élevage
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo: Poľnohospodárske stroje; Chov zvierat
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda: Poljoprivredni strojevi; Stočarstvo
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură: Utilaje agricole; Creșterea animalelor
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft: Landwirtschaftliche Maschinen; Viehhaltung
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector: Landbouwmachines; Veeteelt
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství: Zemědělské stroje; Zootechnika
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство: Селскостопанска техника; Животновъдство
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업: 농업 기계; 축산업
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım: Tarım Makinaları; Hayvancılık
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura: Maquinaria agrícola; Cría de animales
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura: Máquinas agrícolas; Criação de animais
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство: Сельскохозяйственная техника; Животноводство
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk: Landbruksmaskiner; Husdyrhold
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura: Macchinari agricoli; Zootecnia
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture: Agriculture Machinery; Animal Husbandry
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság: Mezőgazdasági gépek; Állattenyésztés
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk: Jordbruksmaskiner; Boskapsskötsel
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp: Máy móc nông nghiệp; Chăn nuôi
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura: Máquinas agrícolas; Pecuária
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo: Kmetijski stroji; Živinoreja
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis: Žemės ūkio technika; Gyvulininkystė
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo: Maszyny rolnicze; Hodowla zwierząt